Illinois, session 104th, SB3299.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 11-2 and 11-3 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-2)7    Sec. 11-2. Election precincts. 8    (a) The County Board in each county, except in counties 9having a population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over, shall, 10at its regular meeting in June or an adjourned meeting in July, 11divide its election precincts so that each precinct shall 12contain, as near as may be practicable, 1,800 1,200 registered 13voters. Insofar as is practicable, each precinct shall be 14situated within a single congressional, legislative and 15representative district and in not more than one County Board 16district and one municipal ward. In order to situate each 17precinct within a single district or ward, the County Board 18shall change the boundaries of election precincts after each 19decennial census as soon as is practicable following the 20completion of congressional and legislative redistricting, 21except that, in 2021, the county board shall change the 22boundaries at a regular or special meeting within 60 days 23after November 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act   SB3299- 2 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1102-668) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. In 2determining whether a division of precincts should be made, 3the county board may anticipate increased voter registration 4in any precinct in which there is in progress new construction 5of dwelling units which will be occupied by voters more than 30 6days before the next election. Each district shall be composed 7of contiguous territory in as compact form as can be for the 8convenience of the electors voting therein. The several county 9boards in establishing districts shall describe them by metes 10and bounds and number them. 11    (b) The And so often thereafter as it shall appear by the 12number of votes cast at the general election held in November 13of any year, that any election district or undivided election 14precinct contains more than 1,200 registered voters, the 15County Board of the county in which an election the district or 16precinct or election precincts are located may be, shall at 17its regular meeting in June, or an adjourned meeting in July 18next, after such November election, redivide, consolidate, or 19readjust such election district or election precinct or 20election precincts, so that no district or election precinct 21shall contain more than the number of votes above specified in 22subsection (a). 23    If for any reason the County Board fails in any year to 24redivide or readjust the election districts or election 25precinct, then the districts or precincts as then existing 26shall continue until the next regular June meeting of the   SB3299- 3 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1County Board; at which regular June meeting or an adjourned 2meeting in July the County Board shall redivide or readjust 3the election districts or election precincts in manner as 4herein required. When at any meeting of the County Board any 5redivision, readjustment, or change in name or number of 6election districts or election precincts is made by the County 7Board, the County Clerk shall immediately notify the State 8Board of Elections of such redivision, readjustment, or 9change. The County Board in every case shall fix and establish 10the places for holding elections in its respective county and 11all elections shall be held at the places so fixed. The polling 12places shall in all cases be upon the ground floor in the front 13room, the entrance to which is in a highway or public street 14which is at least 40 feet wide, and is as near the center of 15the voting population of the precinct as is practicable, and 16for the convenience of the greatest number of electors to vote 17thereat; provided, however, where the County Board is unable 18to secure a suitable polling place within the boundaries of a 19precinct, it may select a polling place at the most 20conveniently located suitable place outside the precinct; but 21in no case shall an election be held in any room used or 22occupied as a saloon, dramshop, bowling alley or as a place of 23resort for idlers and disreputable persons, billiard hall or 24in any room connected therewith by doors or hallways. No 25person shall be permitted to vote at any election except at the 26polling place for the precinct in which he resides, except as   SB3299- 4 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1otherwise provided in this Section or Article 19 of this Code 2Act. In counties having a population of 3,000,000 inhabitants 3or over the County Board shall divide its election precincts 4and shall fix and establish places for holding elections as 5hereinbefore provided during the month of January instead of 6at its regular meeting in June or at an adjourned meeting in 7July.8    However, in the event that additional divisions of 9election precincts are indicated after a division made by the 10County Board in the month of January, such additional 11divisions may be made by the County Board in counties having a 12population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over, at the regular 13meeting in June or at adjourned meeting in July. The county 14board of such county may divide or readjust precincts at any 15meeting of the county board when the voter registration in a 16precinct has increased beyond 1,800 registered voters and an 17election is scheduled before the next regular January or June 18meeting of the county board.19    (c) When in any city, village or incorporated town 20territory has been annexed thereto or disconnected therefrom, 21which annexation or disconnection becomes effective after 22election precincts or election districts have been established 23as above provided in this Section, the clerk of the 24municipality shall inform the county clerk thereof as provided 25in Section 4-21, 5-28.1, or 6-31.1, whichever is applicable. 26In the event that a regular meeting of the County Board is to   SB3299- 5 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1be held after such notification and before any election, the 2County Board shall, at its next regular meeting, establish new 3election precinct lines in affected territory. In the event 4that no regular meeting of the County Board is to be held 5before such election the county clerk shall, within 5 days 6after being so informed, call a special meeting of the county 7board on a day fixed by him not more than 20 days thereafter 8for the purpose of establishing election precincts or election 9districts in the affected territory for the ensuing elections.10    At any consolidated primary or consolidated election at 11which municipal officers are to be elected, and at any 12emergency referendum at which a public question relating to a 13municipality is to be voted on, notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Code, the election authority shall establish 15a polling place within such municipality, upon the request of 16the municipal council or board of trustees at least 60 days 17before the election and provided that the municipality 18provides a suitable polling place. To accomplish this purpose, 19the election authority may establish an election precinct 20constituting a single municipality of under 500 population for 21all elections, notwithstanding the minimum precinct size 22otherwise specified herein.23    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 24the above, when there are no more than 50 registered voters in 25a precinct who are entitled to vote in a local government or 26school district election, the election authority having   SB3299- 6 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1jurisdiction over the precinct is authorized to reassign such 2voters to one or more polling places in adjacent precincts, 3within or without the election authority's jurisdiction, for 4that election. For the purposes of such local government or 5school district election only, the votes of the reassigned 6voters shall be tallied and canvassed as votes from the 7precinct of the polling place to which such voters have been 8reassigned. The election authority having jurisdiction over 9the precinct shall approve all administrative and polling 10place procedures. Such procedures shall take into account 11voter convenience, and ensure that the integrity of the 12election process is maintained and that the secrecy of the 13ballot is not violated.14    (e) Except in the event of a fire, flood or total loss of 15heat in a place fixed or established by any county board or 16election authority pursuant to this Section as a polling place 17for an election, no election authority shall change the 18location of a polling place so established for any precinct 19after notice of the place of holding the election for that 20precinct has been given as required under Article 12 unless 21the election authority notifies all registered voters in the 22precinct of the change in location by first class mail in 23sufficient time for such notice to be received by the 24registered voters in the precinct at least one day prior to the 25date of the election.26    (f) The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts,   SB3299- 7 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1including those where voting machines or electronic voting 2systems are used.3(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; revised 6-24-25.) 4    (10 ILCS 5/11-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-3)5    Sec. 11-3. Election precincts. 6    (a) It shall be the duty of the Board of Commissioners 7established by Article 6 of this Act, within 2 months after its 8first organization, to divide the city, village or 9incorporated town which may adopt or is operating under 10Article 6, into election precincts, each of which shall be 11situated within a single congressional, legislative and 12representative district insofar as is practicable and in not 13more than one County Board district and one municipal ward; in 14order to situate each precinct within a single district or 15ward, the Board of Election Commissioners shall change the 16boundaries of election precincts after each decennial census 17as soon as is practicable following the completion of 18congressional and legislative redistricting and such precincts 19shall contain as nearly as practicable 1,800 registered 20voters : (i) 1,200 registered voters if the precinct is located 21in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; or (ii) 221,800 registered voters if the precinct is located in a county 23with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants. 24    (b) Within 90 days after each presidential election, such 25board in a city with fewer than 500,000 inhabitants, village   SB3299- 8 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1or incorporated town shall revise and rearrange such precincts 2on the basis of the votes cast at such election, making such 3precincts to contain, as near as practicable, 1,200 registered 4voters or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable. However, any 5apartment building in which more than 1,200 or 1,800 6registered voters, as applicable, reside may be made a single 7precinct even though the vote in such precinct exceeds 1,200 8or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable. 9    (c) Within 90 days after each presidential election, a 10board in a city with more than 500,000 inhabitants shall 11revise and rearrange such precincts on the basis of the votes 12cast at such election, making such precincts to contain, as 13near as practicable: (i) 1,200 registered voters if the 14precinct is located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 15inhabitants; or (ii) 1,800 registered voters if the precinct 16is located in a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants. 17However, any apartment building in which more than 1,200 18registered voters or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable, 19reside may be made a single precinct even though the vote in 20such precinct exceeds 1,200 or 1,800 registered voters, as 21applicable.22    (d) Immediately after the annexation of territory to the 23city, village or incorporated town becomes effective the Board 24of Election Commissioners shall revise and rearrange election 25precincts therein to include such annexed territory.26    (e) Provided, however, that at any election where but one   SB3299- 9 -LRB104 19825 SPS 33275 b1candidate is nominated and is to be voted upon at any election 2held in any political subdivision of a city, village or 3incorporated town, the Board of Election Commissioners shall 4have the power in such political subdivision to determine the 5number of voting precincts to be established in such political 6subdivision at such election, without reference to the number 7of qualified voters therein. The precincts in each ward, 8village or incorporated town shall be numbered from one 9upwards, consecutively, with no omission.10    (f) The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts, 11including those where voting machines or electronic voting 12systems are used.13(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21.)